dictsource/uk_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
/// Spelling to phoneme words and exceptions for Ukrainian
// Author: Andrij Mizyk <andm1zyk@proton.me>, 2022

.group а
       а     a
       а́     'a

.group б
       б     b

.group в
       в     B

.group г
       г     h  // вимовляється як середнє між г та х

.group ґ
       ґ     g

.group д
       д     d
       дж    dZ

.group е
       е     E
       е́     'E

.group є
       є     jE
       є́     j'E

.group ж
       ж     Z

.group з
       з     z

.group и
       и     I
       и́     'I

.group і
       і     i:
       і́     'i:

.group ї
       ї     ji:
       ї́     j'i:

.group й
       й     j

.group к
       к     k

.group л
       л     l
       л (і  l^
       лє    l^E
       лю    l^u
       ля    l^a
       ль    l^

.group м
       м     m

.group н
       н     n
       н (і  n^
       нє    n^E
       ню    n^u
       ня    n^a
       нь    n^

.group о
       о     o
       о́     'o

.group п
       п     p

.group р
       р     R

.group с
       с     s

.group т
       т     t[
       ть    t;

.group у
       у     u
       у́     'u

.group ф
       ф     f

.group х
       х     x

.group ц
       ц     ts

.group ч
       ч     tS

.group ш
       ш     S
       ш (в  l#  // швеція

.group щ
       щ     StS

.group ь
       ь     ;

.group ю
       ю     ju
       ю́     j'u

.group я
       я     ja
       я́     j'a

.group ʼ
       ʼ     |
